Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.455

Purchase of works of art—Procedure.

Except as provided under RCW 43.17.210, the Washington state arts commission shall determine the amount to be made available for the purchase of art under RCW 43.17.200 in consultation with the director, and payments therefor shall be made in accordance with law. The designation of projects and sites, selection, contracting, purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design, execution and placement, acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or disposition of works of art shall be the responsibility of the Washington state arts commission in consultation with the director.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 223; 2005 c 36 s 6; 1990 c 33 s 576; 1983 c 204 s 6; 1974 ex.s. c 176 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Severability—1983 c 204: See note following RCW 43.46.090.

Acquisition of works of art for public buildings and lands—Visual arts program established: RCW 43.46.090.

Allocation of moneys for acquisition of works of art—Expenditure by arts commission—Conditions: RCW 43.17.200.

State art collection: RCW 43.46.095.